Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62Q.512] COVERAGE FOR BRAIN ANEURYSM IMAGING SERVICES. new text end new text begin (a) Every health plan company shall provide coverage for the use of imaging services, including but not limited to magnetic resonance imaging, computerized tomography, or angiograms, to identify and check on the status of unruptured brain aneurysms. new text end new text begin (b) The imaging services described in paragraph (a) must be provided with no cost sharing at least annually to women 40 years of age or older and be classified as a preventive service. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, and applies to health plans offered, issued, or renewed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Laboratory, deleted text begin x-raydeleted text end new text begin imagingnew text end , and opioid testing services. (a) Medical assistance covers laboratory deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end x-raynew text begin , and other imagingnew text end services. (b) Medical assistance covers screening and urinalysis tests for opioids without lifetime or annual limits. (c) Medical assistance covers laboratory tests ordered and performed by a licensed pharmacist, according to the requirements of section 151.01, subdivision 27, clause (3), at no less than the rate for which the same services are covered when provided by any other licensed practitioner. new text begin (d) Medical assistance coverage for brain aneurysm imaging must meet the requirements that would otherwise apply to health plan companies under section 62Q.512. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin PUBLIC AWARENESS CAMPAIGN.new text end new text begin Beginning January 1, 2026, and for two years thereafter, the commissioner of health shall operate a statewide public awareness campaign related to the risks of brain aneurysms for women 40 years of age or older and the coverage that may be available to them under Minnesota Statutes, section 62Q.512. new text end